Hawaii statutes.
§291C-12 Accidents involving death or
serious bodily injury. (a) The driver of any vehicle involved in an
accident resulting in serious bodily injury to or death of any person shall
immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close thereto
as possible but shall then forthwith return to and in every event shall remain
at the scene of the accident until the driver has fulfilled the requirements of
section 291C-14. Every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic
more than is necessary.

(b) Any person who violates subsection (a)
shall be guilty of a class B felony.

(c) The license or permit to drive and any
nonresident operating privilege of the person so convicted shall be revoked.

(d) For any violation under this section, a
surcharge of $500 shall be imposed, in addition to any other penalties, and
shall be deposited into the neurotrauma special fund.

(e) For any violation under this section, a
surcharge of up to $500 may be imposed, in addition to other penalties, which
shall be deposited into the trauma system special fund. [L 1971, c 150, pt of
§1; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 243, §4; am L 2002, c 160, §7; am L 2008, c 231, §7]

Case Notes

One cannot be convicted of both attempted murder by driving
over another and a violation of this section. 1 H. App. 625, 623 P.2d 1271.

Failure to stop offense committed prior to 1992 amendment
must be sentenced as a class C felony. 9 H. App. 333, 839 P.2d 1186.

Criminal liability under subsection (a) does not require
proof that the driver of a vehicle caused injury to or death of a person, but
only that the accident the driver was involved in resulted in injury to or
death of any person; under subsection (a), a driver is "involved in an
accident" when driver's vehicle is affected or implicated in the
accident. 77 H. 329 (App.), 884 P.2d 392.

Not inconsistent that jury found defendant not guilty of
negligent homicide in third degree, but guilty of intentionally, knowingly, or
recklessly failing to stop at accident scene. 77 H. 329 (App.), 884 P.2d 392.

Where (1) traffic accident victim, and not defendant, caused
the accident, (2) it appeared that victim's vehicle flipped over on its roof
causing victim's immediate death upon impact, and (3) there was no evidence in
the record that defendant's criminal misconduct of failing to remain at the
scene of the accident, provide information, and render reasonable assistance
pursuant to this section and §291C-14 caused victim's injuries or death, no
nexus between defendant's conduct and victim's injuries and death had been
demonstrated; thus, restitution could not be imposed under §706-646. 121 H.
191 (App.), 216 P.3d 117 (2009).

This section does not speak in terms of requiring a driver to
complete the requirements of §291C-14(a) only; this section allows compliance
by satisfying the requirements of either §291C-14(a) or (b); the prosecution
needs to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant failed to fulfill the
requirements under §291C-14(a) or (b), which set forth specific conduct
constituting the offense. The requirements in §291C-14(a) and (b) were
essential elements that needed to be included in the charge; the mere reference
to §291C-14 in the indictment was insufficient to allege the specific
requirements in §291C-14(a) and (b) that petitioner was alleged to have
contravened. 129 H. 30, 292 P.3d 1260 (2013).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next